Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 39 Rights Of Surviving Family Members
28-39-407. Rights of children or issue — Limitations.

Subsequently Born or Adopted Children.Whenever a child shall have been born to or adopted by a testator after the testator has made his or her will, and the testator shall die leaving the after-born or adopted child not mentioned or provided for in his or her will either specifically or as a member of a class, the testator shall be deemed to have died intestate with respect to the child. The child shall be entitled to recover from the devisees in proportion to the amounts of their respective shares, that portion of the estate which he or she would have inherited had there been no will.

Pretermitted Children.If, at the time of the execution of a will, there is a living child of the testator, or living child or issue of a deceased child of the testator, whom the testator shall omit to mention or provide for, either specifically or as a member of a class, the testator shall be deemed to have died intestate with respect to the child or issue. The child or issue shall be entitled to recover from the devisees in proportion to the amounts of their respective shares, that portion of the estate which he or she or they would have inherited had there been no will.

Ark. L. Notes.

Atkinson, A Comparison of Ark. Code Ann. §28-39-407 With Uniform Probate Code § 2-302, 1995 Ark. L. Notes 1.

Ark. L. Rev.

Decedent's Estates — Rights of a Judgment Lien Creditor Against a Pretermitted Heir, 25 Ark. L. Rev. 353.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Property, 12 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 225.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

This section held constitutional. Holland v. Willis, 293 Ark. 518, 739 S.W.2d 529 (1987).

Subsection (b) of this section applied only to wills and not to trusts created during the life of the settler, because the pretermitted-heir statute spoke only in terms of wills, and not of trusts; the pretermitted-heir statute, which spoke only in terms of the execution of a will, did not apply in instances in which there was no will.Kidwell v. Rhew, 371 Ark. 490, 268 S.W.3d 309 (2007).

The object of former similar statute was to prevent injustice to a child or descendant from occurring by reason of the forgetfulness of a testator who might, at the time of making his will, overlook the fact that he has a child or descendant. Culp v. Culp, 206 Ark. 875, 178 S.W.2d 52 (1944) (decision under prior law).

The purpose of a former similar statute was not to require a testator to make some devise to each of his children, but to insure that there should be no unintentional disinheritance of a child by the testator. Taylor v. Cammack, 209 Ark. 983, 193 S.W.2d 323 (1946) (decision under prior law).

The purpose of the pretermitted child statute is not to compel a testator to make a provision for his children, but to guard against testamentary thoughtlessness. Young v. Young, 288 Ark. 199, 703 S.W.2d 457 (1986).

Holographic will held to be clear in its provision and to take precedence over any other will. Mangum v. Estate of Fuller, 303 Ark. 411, 797 S.W.2d 452 (1990).

Extrinsic evidence is inadmissible to show that a testator was aware of a pretermitted child and intended to disinherit her. Hare v. First Sec. Bank, 261 Ark. 79, 546 S.W.2d 427 (1977).

Under this section, extrinsic evidence of the testator's intent is not admissible. Armstrong v. Butler, 262 Ark. 31, 553 S.W.2d 453 (1977); Mangum v. Estate of Fuller, 303 Ark. 411, 797 S.W.2d 452 (1990).

This section operates in favor of a pretermitted child without regard to the real intention of the testator in regard to the omission. Armstrong v. Butler, 262 Ark. 31, 553 S.W.2d 453 (1977).

The fact that one paragraph of a will provided that the decedent's estate would, upon nonsurvival of all the named heirs, pass under the laws of descent and distribution of Missouri did not establish that the decedent intended to omit her sons by her first marriage from the will, even though they were not mentioned in the will. Robinson v. Mays, 271 Ark. 818, 610 S.W.2d 885 (1981).

Where a decedent's holographic will, written during his residency in Canada, did not mention his children, under subsection (b) of this section that the omission operated in favor of the pretermitted children; hence, in the letter order issued by the trial court the children were properly awarded the decedent's real property in Arkansas. Craig v. Carrigo, 353 Ark. 761, 121 S.W.3d 154 (2003).

In a suit to recover the share of a child pretermitted by will, evidence that the plaintiff was born two months after her mother's marriage and that she resembled a man who had kept company with her mother was not sufficient to overcome the presumption that she was legitimate. Jacobs v. Jacobs, 146 Ark. 45, 225 S.W. 22 (1920) (decision under prior law).

The presumption against intestacy is subordinate to the statutory presumption against the disherison of a child or the issue of a deceased child because the presumption against intestacy actually is much more than a presumption. Armstrong v. Butler, 262 Ark. 31, 553 S.W.2d 453 (1977).

An omission in a will is presumed to be unintentional where the testator fails to mention his children or provide for them as a member of a class, if no contrary intent appears in the will itself. Robinson v. Mays, 271 Ark. 818, 610 S.W.2d 885 (1981).

The great grandchild of a testator could not recover upon the ground that she was not mentioned in the will of her ancestress if she was not living at the time the will was made or if her mother was then living and was named by class as a grandchild. King v. Byrne, 92 Ark. 88, 122 S.W. 96 (1909) (decision under prior law).

Grandchildren held to be pretermitted. Gray v. Parks, 94 Ark. 39, 125 S.W. 1023 (1910) (decision under prior law); King v. King, 273 Ark. 55, 616 S.W.2d 483 (1981).

Adopted children entitled to inherit as pretermitted children. James v. Helmich, 186 Ark. 1053, 57 S.W.2d 829 (1933) (decision under prior law); Graham v. Hill, 226 Ark. 258, 289 S.W.2d 186 (1956).

Where a daughter not mentioned in will was left something by a codicil and the codicil was invalid, she inherited as if there was no will. Noblit v. Noblit, 223 Ark. 220, 265 S.W.2d 520 (1954).

A pretermitted child is entitled to his remedy during the administration of an estate, and the provision for recovering from the devisee is only brought into being after the estate has been closed or after sufficient funds have been paid out of the estate to prevent the pretermitted child from acquiring his full statutory share. Parker v. Bowlan, 242 Ark. 192, 412 S.W.2d 597 (1967).

Where pretermitted children instituted a suit for a partition of the real estate in the estate within four months following wrongful distribution, their suit was timely and not barred by laches even though decedent had died some seven years before. Negovanov v. Wensko, 248 Ark. 1109, 455 S.W.2d 929 (1970).

Children held to be pretermitted. Farmers Coop. Ass'n v. Webb, 249 Ark. 277, 459 S.W.2d 815 (1970); Robinson v. Mays, 271 Ark. 818, 610 S.W.2d 885 (1981).

Where the testator failed to name two of her children who were deceased at the time of the execution of her will and her will also included a provision “If any of my children should die before I do,” the phrase “my children” was referring to only the children living at the time the codicil was executed. Thus, the grandchildren of the deceased children were pretermitted heirs and entitled to share in the estate. Estate of Cisco v. Cisco, 288 Ark. 552, 707 S.W.2d 769 (1986).

As a general rule, the testator's use of a word which describes a class of persons is considered to be sufficient identification of the claimant to preclude the application of the pretermitted heir statute. Estate of Cisco v. Cisco, 288 Ark. 552, 707 S.W.2d 769 (1986).

Grandchildren were pretermitted where neither they nor their father, who died before the will was executed, were mentioned or provided for in the will. Holland v. Willis, 293 Ark. 518, 739 S.W.2d 529 (1987).

This section directs that children shall take as though decedent had died intestate only when testator fails to mention or provide for them, specifically or as a class, and does not permit children to take against will simply because testator failed to make provision for them in will; if testator mentioned children, specifically or as a class, this section does not apply and children are not pretermitted. Dykes v. Dykes, 294 Ark. 158, 741 S.W.2d 256 (1987).

If the word “heir” or “heirs” is used by the testator in a colloquial sense to refer to children, or descendants, as opposed to a technical, legal sense, then the requirements of subsection (b) are met. Leatherwood v. Meisch, 297 Ark. 91, 759 S.W.2d 559 (1988).

Insertion of a rule-against-perpetuities clause and other general references to undesignated persons in a testator's will did not show that testator had his grandson, as issue of the testator's predeceased child, so clearly in mind as to have met the requirements of the pretermitted child statute, subsection (b) of this section. Alexander v. Estate of Alexander, 351 Ark. 359, 93 S.W.3d 688 (2002).

Illegitimate child was awarded a share of his father's estate as a pretermitted heir where the wife waived an issue regarding competent jurisdiction by failing to object to a failure to join the estate in a paternity action; moreover, collateral estoppel applied because the wife appeared at the paternity proceeding, it was fully litigated, the necessary party issue was not raised, and no appeal was filed. Taylor v. Hamilton, 90 Ark. App. 235, 205 S.W.3d 149 (2005).

Decedent's illegitimate, pretermitted child was not entitled to inherit from decedent as he was required to meet requirements of subsection (b) of this section, §28-1-102(a)(1), and the six requirements of §28-9-209(d), but he failed to show that he had been recognized by the decedent or by a court and he failed to file his action within 180 days of decedent's death.Shelton v. Keathley, 367 Ark. 568, 242 S.W.3d 223 (2006).

An omitted child or grandchild was not remitted solely to the remedy in the probate court against the devisees or legatees but could sue to recover land descended to him from purchasers holding under the devisees or legatees or under a power contained in the will. Rowe v. Allison, 87 Ark. 206, 112 S.W. 395 (1908) (decision under prior law).

A child adopted three years after the adopting parents had made a will stood in the position of a natural child born subsequent to the execution of the will and inherited accordingly. Grimes v. Jones, 193 Ark. 858, 103 S.W.2d 359 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Son's claim pursuant to the After-Born Child Statute, subsection (a) of this section, extinguished a nephew's rights as a named beneficiary of a joint will because the son's rights prevailed where there was a conflict between the rights of the couple to execute a joint will to dispose of their estates and the rights of an after-born child.Dotson v. Dotson, 2009 Ark. App. 819, 372 S.W.3d 398 (2009), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. App. LEXIS 74 (Jan. 20, 2010), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Ark. LEXIS 331 (June 3, 2010).

A will in which the testator provides for all of his children as a class without expressly naming them is a sufficient mention of his children. Brown v. Nelms, 86 Ark. 368, 112 S.W. 373 (1908); Duensing v. Duensing, 112 Ark. 362, 165 S.W. 956 (1914) (decision under prior law).

A bequest to a son of the testator and to son's children sufficiently designated the children. LeFlore v. Handlin, 153 Ark. 421, 240 S.W. 712 (1922) (decision under prior law).

Former statute was complied with where the testator either mentioned each of his children by name or provided for them as a class without naming them separately. Yeates v. Yeates, 179 Ark. 543, 16 S.W.2d 996, 65 A.L.R. 466 (1929) (decision under prior law).

Where testator actually wrote the name of his daughter in the body of his will along with a statement of the amount of insurance policy payable to her, he did not omit to mention the name of his daughter in his will and he did not die intestate as to her. Culp v. Culp, 206 Ark. 875, 178 S.W.2d 52 (1944) (decision under prior law).

Where there was uncertainty or ambiguity in designated beneficiary of a will, extrinsic evidence was admissible for purpose of identifying intended beneficiary who was found not entitled to share in estate as a pretermitted heir under subsection (b). Tullis v. Minchew, 239 Ark. 222, 388 S.W.2d 393 (1965).

Whether the word “descendants” as a description of the beneficiaries of the trust sufficiently describes a class within the meaning of this section is to be determined by a consideration of the will as a whole. Petty v. Chaney, 281 Ark. 72, 661 S.W.2d 373 (1983).

Daughter who was not mentioned or provided for by name in her father's will was sufficiently mentioned or provided for in a paragraph of the will creating a trust for the testator's “descendants” and was not entitled to share in father's estate as a child whom testator failed to provide for. Petty v. Chaney, 281 Ark. 72, 661 S.W.2d 373 (1983).

Considering will as a whole, reference therein to “all of my heirs or other relatives” was sufficient to mention the testator's children as a class and to exclude them from inheritance. Young v. Young, 288 Ark. 199, 703 S.W.2d 457 (1986).

This section does not require testator to provide for his heirs, only to mention them. Child does not have to be specifically named, but can be included as a member of the class. Holland v. Willis, 293 Ark. 518, 739 S.W.2d 529 (1987).

This section is not broad enough to cover a child to whom the testator only stood in loco parentis, because birth or adoption, each, creates a permanent relationship whereas the relationship in loco parentis is temporary. Bryant v. Thrower, 239 Ark. 783, 394 S.W.2d 488 (1965).

If the names of all, any, or either of testator's children or their legal representatives were omitted in his will, the will was not void, but he would be deemed as having died intestate as to those omitted. Branton v. Branton, 23 Ark. 569, 1861 Ark. LEXIS 161 (1861); Boyd v. Epperson, 149 Ark. 527, 232 S.W. 939 (1921) (decision under prior law).

Omission of the name of a child from a will does not thereby make it void; but those omitted may recover of the devisees and legatees their distributive shares. Trotter v. Trotter, 31 Ark. 145 (1876); Bloom v. Strauss, 73 Ark. 56, 84 S.W. 511 (1904) (decision under prior law).

A will of a citizen of another state seeking to transmit lands situated in this state was without effect as to the lands where he omitted to name his only surviving child therein. Crossett Lumber Co. v. Files, 104 Ark. 600, 149 S.W. 908 (1912) (decision under prior law).

This section does not preclude persons other than the child from bringing a petition to contest a will. Parker v. Bowlan, 242 Ark. 192, 412 S.W.2d 597 (1967).

Cited: Odom v. Travelers Ins. Co., 174 F. Supp. 426 (W.D. Ark. 1959); Negovanov v. Wensko, 248 Ark. 1109, 455 S.W.2d 929 (1970); Frakes v. Hunt, 266 Ark. 171, 583 S.W.2d 497 (1979); Willis v. Estate of Adams, 304 Ark. 35, 799 S.W.2d 800 (1990).

Cross References. Probate court has original jurisdiction over decedents' estates, §28-1-104.

Effective Dates. Acts 1951, No. 255, § 15: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there is a likelihood of misconstruction of certain provisions of the Probate Code, and that an urgent need exists for clarification thereof and certain additions thereto in order that the law relating to proceedings in probate may be construed and administered in a uniform manner throughout the State, in accordance with the legislative intent; for the accomplishment of which purposes this Act is adopted. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 4: June 12, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that existing law relating to notice to creditors only by the publication of legal notice may be unconstitutional by reason of recent decisions of the United States Supreme Court. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 59, § 5: Nov. 16, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain language appearing in Act 939 of the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, was in included in the act in error, thus resulting in ambiguity and uncertainty as to the meaning and effect of its provisions, and this act deletes the erroneous language of Act 929. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

ALR.

Right to probate subsequently discovered will as affected by completed prior proceedings in intestate administration. 2 A.L.R.4th 1315.

Inheritability or descendability of right to contest will. 11 A.L.R.4th 907.

Validity and enforceability of provision of will or trust instrument for forfeiture or reduction of share of contesting beneficiary. 23 A.L.R.4th 369.

Creditor's right to prevent debtor's renunciation of benefit under will or debtor's election to take under will. 39 A.L.R.4th 633.

Am. Jur. 79 Am. Jur. 2d, Wills, § 723 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Acts 1949 General Assembly—Act 140 The Probate Code, 3 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

C.J.S. 95 C.J.S., Wills, § 445 et seq.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Arkansas Law Survey, Looney, Decedents' Estates, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 139.

No notice shall be jurisdictional except as provided in §§ 28-40-110 and 28-53-103.

If the probate court grants letters of administration instead of letters testamentary, the error should be corrected on appeal. The letters will not be void until reversed. Jackson v. Reeve, 44 Ark. 496 (1884) (decision under prior law).

The notice by a probate clerk to a surviving spouse to elect to take against a will is not jurisdictional, and therefore the failure to notify will not give her heirs her personal right to take against the will. Jeffcoat v. Harper, 224 Ark. 778, 276 S.W.2d 429 (1955).

The adjudication by the probate court of the necessity for administration is conclusive in a collateral issue. Stewart v. Smiley, 46 Ark. 373 (1885); Sharp v. Himes, 129 Ark. 327, 196 S.W. 131 (1917) (decisions under prior law).

The appointment by the probate court of an administrator is conclusive of the question of necessity for administration, but it is not conclusive of the question whether or not the lands of the estate are needed to pay debts. Turley v. Gorman, 133 Ark. 473, 202 S.W. 822 (1918) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Brickey v. Lacy, 247 Ark. 906, 448 S.W.2d 331 (1969); Brown v. Kennedy Well Works, Inc., 302 Ark. 213, 788 S.W.2d 948 (1990); Schieffler v. Pulaski Bank & Trust Co. (In re Molitor), 183 B.R. 547 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. 1995); Wilson v. Wilson, 327 Ark. 386, 939 S.W.2d 287 (1997); Ferguson v. Ferguson, 2009 Ark. App. 549, 334 S.W.3d 425 (2009).

In the county in this state where the decedent resided at the time of his or her death;

If the decedent did not reside in this state, then in the county wherein is situated the greater part, in value, of the property of the decedent located in this state;

If the decedent had no residence or property in this state, but died in this state, then in the county in which he or she died; and

If the decedent had no residence or property in this state and died outside of this state, then in any county in which a cause of action may be maintained by his or her personal representative.

If it appears to the court at any time before the order of final distribution that the proceeding was commenced in the wrong county or that it would be for the best interest of the estate, then the court, in its discretion, may order the proceeding with all papers, files, and a certified copy of all orders therein transferred to another circuit court, which need not be a court of proper venue under other provisions of this section. The other court shall thereupon proceed to complete the administration proceeding as if originally commenced therein.

The bond, if any, of the personal representative filed in the court from which the proceeding is transferred shall remain in effect unless and until replaced by a new bond ordered and approved by the court to which the proceeding is transferred.

Ark. L. Rev.

Recent Development: Arkansas Act 438 of 2007, 60 Ark. L. Rev. 1023.

Nothing in this section authorizes a personal representative to sue or be sued until such time as he has received letters of administration. Jenkins v. Means, 242 Ark. 111, 411 S.W.2d 885 (1967).

Action against executor to try title to property in dispute in the probate court and to require settlement and contribution of the estate was a local and not a transitory action and properly brought in the county where the estate was being probated rather than in county where executor resided. Gocio v. Seamster, 203 Ark. 944, 160 S.W.2d 197 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Letters should be granted in county in which testator or intestate dies; the probate court of another county has no jurisdiction. Shelton v. Shelton, 180 Ark. 959, 23 S.W.2d 629 (1930) (decision under prior law).

Provision requiring administration of estate to be in county where deceased is residing at time of death is mandatory. Smith v. Rudolph, 221 Ark. 900, 256 S.W.2d 736 (1953).

The will of a nonresident of this state may have original probate in this state if the testator owned property in this state which might be the subject of administration in this state, or where there was a debt or demand due the testator which required administration to collect. However, unless a nonresident has land in this state or debt or demand owing him, the will of the nonresident is not subject to probate in this state. McPherson v. McKay, 205 Ark. 1135, 172 S.W.2d 911 (1943) (decision under prior law).

It was error for the trial court to determine that it had venue to probate decedent's will because decedent was not a resident of that county at the time of his death and the statute clearly required probate proceedings to go forward in the county where decedent resided before his death; even if decedent was arguably domiciled in the county, venue was still not proper. Lawrence v. Sullivan, 90 Ark. App. 206, 205 S.W.3d 168 (2005).

Where the estate of a deceased person has been closed, an action for partition of the land among the heirs should be brought in the county where the land or some part of it is situated and not in the county where the deceased's personal representatives qualified. Cowling v. Nelson, 76 Ark. 146, 88 S.W. 913 (1905) (decision under prior law).

Purported will of testator, who was a resident of this state, probated in Texas under statutory provision similar to this statute was not subject to attack in the courts of this state. State ex rel. Attorney General v. Wright, 194 Ark. 652, 109 S.W.2d 123 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Jurisdiction for the sale of deceased's land is only in the probate court of the county in which the personal representative was qualified, not in another county in which the land may be located. Gordon v. Howell, 35 Ark. 381 (1880) (decision under prior law).

Where deceased did not live or die in the county where administrator was appointed, the appointment was void and a judgment obtained by the administrator against a corporation wrongfully causing the death of the deceased was properly set aside. Groschner v. Winton, 146 Ark. 520, 226 S.W. 162 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Odom v. Travelers Ins. Co., 174 F. Supp. 426 (W.D. Ark. 1959); Filyaw v. Bouton, 87 Ark. App. 320, 191 S.W.3d 540 (2004).

This section not only limits to five years the time in which a will may be admitted to probate, but also limits to five years the time in which letters of administration may be granted. Horn v. Horn, 226 Ark. 27, 287 S.W.2d 586 (1956).

Proponent of the will of a person who died before the effective date of this section did not have a vested right to probate the will more than five years after the effective date of this section. Horn v. Horn, 226 Ark. 27, 287 S.W.2d 586 (1956).

The will of person who died more than five years before the effective date of this section could not be probated more than five years after the effective date of this section. Horn v. Horn, 226 Ark. 27, 287 S.W.2d 586 (1956).

This section and §28-9-209 are not applicable in a paternity case; paternity action must be commenced in chancery court because it is not a determination of heirship. In re Estate of F.C., 321 Ark. 191, 900 S.W.2d 200 (1995).

An application to the court within the meaning of this section was made when proponents of a will filed a verified petition for probate within three days after death of the testator, and a personal appearance before the probate court was not necessary. Minchew v. Tullis, 236 Ark. 818, 368 S.W.2d 282 (1963).

Where the widow of a deceased invoked the aid of a court to permit her to serve as administrator, although her first request for appointment was after expiration of period for probating will, she could not later complain that the court was without the power to make such an appointment. Davis v. Adams, 231 Ark. 197, 328 S.W.2d 851 (1959).

2012 Arkansas probate of the decedent's will was proper because that will had previously been admitted to probate in Florida; even then, however, if the real property involved were purchased after the death of the testator by a third party from a person who, but for the will, would have been the intestate heir of the decedent, interests in the property would not be affected by the probate of the will after the expiration of the five-year period if the instrument of transfer had been recorded in the county where the real property is located.Christian v. McVesting, LLC, 2014 Ark. App. 509, 443 S.W.3d 578 (2014).

But for the will, the decedent's son would have been the intestate heir of the decedent, and the son quitclaimed his interest in the property to a company by an instrument recorded on June 24, 2009, and the will had not been admitted to probate in Arkansas until October 23, 2012; the trial court erred in denying the devisees'motion to intervene, given that, as named devisees of the property in question in the decedent's will, the devisees clearly had a recognized interest in the mineral interests in the property that the company's petition sought to settle.Christian v. McVesting, LLC, 2014 Ark. App. 509, 443 S.W.3d 578 (2014).

Where deceased had two wills, one being probated, and the later will was offered for probate more than five years after testator's death, the later will was barred by this section despite the contention it was offered as a counterclaim and therefore not subject to this section. Coleman v. Coleman, 257 Ark. 404, 520 S.W.2d 239 (1975).

This section, which limits the period within which a will may be admitted to probate to five years from the testator's death, applies to a nonresident's will which has been admitted to probate in a foreign jurisdiction. Sims v. Schavey, 234 Ark. 166, 351 S.W.2d 145, 87 A.L.R.2d 718 (1961).

Where a will, together with the necessary proof of its execution, was filed with the probate clerk in 1947, but the clerk failed to enter an order admitting the will to probate, the party had fully complied with the requirements of former provisions for the probate of the will, notwithstanding the oversight of the clerk, and it was not barred by the subsequently enacted statute of limitation contained in this section. Muldrew v. Dodson, 237 Ark. 852, 376 S.W.2d 672 (1964) (decision under prior law).

The time limit of this section did not apply to prevent the probate of a will which, together with necessary proof of its execution, had been filed with the probate clerk in 1947 under repealed § 60-209, but where the clerk had failed to enter an order admitting it to probate. Muldrew v. Dodson, 237 Ark. 852, 376 S.W.2d 672 (1964) (decision under prior law).

Former limitations period in effect prior to the 1963 amendment of this section barred probate of decedent's will because she died in 1962, and the five-year period from her death had passed. Delafield v. Lewis, 299 Ark. 50, 770 S.W.2d 659 (1989).

Probate division of the circuit court was statutorily time-barred from administering an estate under this section because the probate court had no authority to administer an estate past the five-year limit set forth in the statute. Furthermore, the passage of almost 100 years from the death of the title owners of the real property in the estate was not an exception to the statute.Edwards v. Hart, 2020 Ark. App. 182,598 S.W.3d 543 (2020).

Proceeding in 1950 to probate will of person who died in 1935 was not barred by five year limitation period contained in the 1949 Code, since the Probate Code is not retroactive. Hudson v. Hudson, 219 Ark. 211, 242 S.W.2d 154 (1951).

Where oil, gas, and mineral interests were deeded from grandchild to her aunt several weeks before will was offered to probate in Louisiana, but that will was not offered for probate in Arkansas until 10 years later, the fact that the granddaughter may have had notice of the existence of the will before her conveyance did not cause the conveyance not to be qualified as a “purchase” under subsection (c) of this section and thus foreclose the admission of the will to probate despite the expiration of the five-year period under this section, since the phrase “purchase” as used in subsection (c) of this section does not mean or imply a bona fide purchaser without notice. Cooper v. Tosco Corp., 272 Ark. 294, 613 S.W.2d 831 (1981).

Cited: Blair v. Bradley, 238 Ark. 191, 379 S.W.2d 5 (1964); Johnson v. Johnson, 292 Ark. 536, 732 S.W.2d 121 (1987).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

The intent of subsections (b) and (c) was not to alter existing laws affecting the timely probate of wills in order to give effect to their provisions, but to evidence a claim of ownership by one who has been in possession of property consistent with the terms of an unrevoked will which was not probated. Johnson v. Johnson, 292 Ark. 536, 732 S.W.2d 121 (1987).

Actual possession, rather than constructive possession, is contemplated for subsection (b) to apply. Johnson v. Johnson, 292 Ark. 536, 732 S.W.2d 121 (1987).

Trial court did not err when it found that, under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a niece was the owner of the content's of her deceased uncle's safety deposit box where, even though his will had not been probated, a copy of his unprobated will named her as sole beneficiary; the situation fit within the parameters of subsection (b)(2), which thus allowed evidence of the testator's intention and provided the evidence that supported the trial court's conclusion that niece was the owner of the box contents. Atkinson v. Knowles, 82 Ark. App. 224, 105 S.W.3d 818 (2003).

Where chancellor gave effect to the provisions of will which had been admitted to probate in 1936, since the will was filed and admitted to probate in a timely manner, and there were no inequities resulting from the unusual delay in closing the estate, there was no reason to disturb the chancellor's decision giving full effect to the will. Blundell v. Estate of Cox, 297 Ark. 320, 760 S.W.2d 872 (1988).

Where the testator's duly executed will, though never probated, remained unrevoked, where there had been no administration of the estate, and where the testator's devisee for life had possessed the property until his death, the will was properly admitted as evidence of the devise of the testator's property to the remainderman. Smith v. Ward, 278 Ark. 62, 643 S.W.2d 549 (1982).

A decedent's unprobated, duly executed, and nonrevoked will was properly admitted as evidence of devise of farm property since devisees under the will met the requirement of actual possession, notwithstanding that they did not physically possess the property, where (1) the devisees made the tenant aware that they owned the land and that they intended to continue the arrangement the tenant had with the decedent, (2) they conferred with the tenant about what crops to grow and the operation of the farm, (3) they visited the farm two or three times a year, (4) they signed a power of attorney and completed government documents, (5) they received subsidies from the government, and one-third of the profits generated by the tenant as rent, (6) as the will provided, they split the costs and income of the property evenly, (7) they also split the costs of expenses, insurance, real estate taxes, and levee taxes, and (8) when a bridge on the property collapsed, they posted no trespassing notices and blocked access to the bridge. Songer v. Wiggens, 71 Ark. App. 152, 27 S.W.3d 755 (2000).

Circuit court erred in granting the declaratory judgment in favor of the heirs and ordering the decedent's land to be sold and the proceeds divided accordingly, where the circuit court's ruling was based on an erroneous interpretation and application of this section; because the small-estate procedure was excepted from the requirements of this section and §28-41-101, the issue of whether the beneficiary commenced a probate proceeding was irrelevant.Osborn v. Bryant, 2009 Ark. 358, 324 S.W.3d 687 (2009).

Cited: Odom v. Travelers Ins. Co., 174 F. Supp. 426 (W.D. Ark. 1959); Rachel v. Johnson, 230 Ark. 1003, 328 S.W.2d 87 (1959); Delafield v. Lewis, 299 Ark. 50, 770 S.W.2d 659 (1989).

Where a will provided for a trust under the supervision of the chancery court, which assumed administration of the trust, the probate court had jurisdiction to determine whether bequest under the will was payable since it was concerned with administration of the estate, but it did not have jurisdiction to determine whether petitioner had right to rents and possession of trust lands since that involved administration of the trust under supervision of the chancery court. Cross v. McLaren, 223 Ark. 674, 267 S.W.2d 956 (1954).

Executor of decedent's will was not required to deliver the will to the proper court where he was the named executor of the will; further, under §28-40-107, an illegitimate child who had never been declared legitimate did not qualify as an interested person within the Probate Code who was required to recieve notice.Shelton v. Keathley, 367 Ark. 568, 242 S.W.3d 223 (2006).

A will, though fully proven and established, confers no power on an executor other than for the burial of the deceased and the preservation of his estate; the authority of the executor to act as such is derived from the letters testamentary, and his appointment must be confirmed by a probate court. Diamond v. Shell, 15 Ark. (2 Barber) 26 (1854) (decision under prior law).

In Arkansas, an executor de son tort, as at common law, is unknown. Rust v. Witherington, 17 Ark. (4 Barber) 129 (1856) (decision under prior law).

One who intermeddles without authority in the estate of a deceased person is responsible to the rightful executor and not to a creditor. Barasien v. Odum, 17 Ark. (4 Barber) 122 (1856) (decision under prior law).

An executor's powers before qualification are limited to the burial of the deceased and the preservation of his estate; if before then he intermeddles with the estate, his subsequent qualification legalizes his tortious act, making him liable to those interested in the estate and protecting the party with whom he deals. McDearmon v. Maxfield, 38 Ark. 631 (1882) (decision under prior law).

Nothing in this section authorizes a personal representative to sue or be sued until such time as he has received letters of administration. Jenkins v. Means, 242 Ark. 111, 411 S.W.2d 885 (1967).

For the appointment of an administrator if no executor is nominated in the will or if the person so named is disqualified or unsuitable, or refuses to serve, or if there is no will.

If the decedent did not reside in the state at the time of his or her death, a general description of the property situated in each county in this state and the value thereof;

If the venue is based upon § 28-40-102(a)(4), the facts establishing the venue;

If the decedent died testate and the will is not filed, the contents of the will, either by attaching a copy of it to the petition or, if the will is lost, destroyed, or suppressed, by including a statement of the provisions of the will so far as known;

The names and residence addresses of the persons, if any, nominated as executors; and

If the appointment of a personal representative is sought, the name and residence address of the person for whom letters are prayed, his or her relationship to the decedent, or other facts, if any, which entitle the person to appointment.

The probate judge did not abuse her discretion in finding that the decedent's sister was unsuitable to serve in the position of executrix, in light of her simultaneous role as executrix of the decedent's late wife's estate. Burch v. Griffe, 342 Ark. 615, 29 S.W.3d 726 (2000).

Circuit court erred in appointing appellee as the administratrix of the decedent's estate because appellee was not an “interested person” under the relevant statutes with standing to petition the probate court.Lucas v. Wilson, 2011 Ark. App. 584, 385 S.W.3d 891 (2011).

The notation of the clerk on the reverse side of a will showing the filing, followed by a notation of the judge approving “the action of the clerk admitting the will to probate” was substantial compliance with former statute admitting the will to probate. Holliday v. Phillips Petroleum Co., 275 F. Supp. 686 (E.D. Ark. 1967) (decision under prior law).

Executor of decedent's will was not required to deliver the will to the proper court under §28-40-105 because he was the named executor of the will; further, an illegitimate child who had never been declared legitimate did not qualify as an interested person within the Probate Code who was required to recieve notice.Shelton v. Keathley, 367 Ark. 568, 242 S.W.3d 223 (2006).

Cited: Boatman v. Dawkins, 294 Ark. 421, 743 S.W.2d 800 (1988).

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

Where claimant filed a claim against the estate of the deceased more than six months after the first notice to creditors, but less than six months after the heirs had filed their waivers of notice, the claim was properly disallowed. Chamberlain v. Crawford, 236 Ark. 468, 366 S.W.2d 897 (1963).

If the heirs feel aggrieved at any action taken or are of the view that some right has been denied them because no notice was given them, they have the prerogative (under certain circumstances) to complain. Chamberlain v. Crawford, 236 Ark. 468, 366 S.W.2d 897 (1963).

Cited: Wilson v. Davis, 239 Ark. 305, 389 S.W.2d 442 (1965).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 39; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-507.